Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1731
Marketing plan; advertisement; name and address of seller; required.

In selling, leasing, or offering to sell or lease a seller-assisted marketing plan in this state, sellers of such plans shall not place or cause to be placed any advertisement for a seller-assisted marketing plan which does not include the actual business name of the seller, and if it differs, the name under which the seller-assisted marketing plan is operated and the street address of the principal place of business of the seller.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 31.